Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.771

Effect of conversion.

(1) An organization that has been converted pursuant to this article is for all purposes the same entity that existed before the conversion.

(2) When a conversion takes effect:

(a) The title to all real estate and other property owned by the converting organization remains vested in the converted organization without reversion or impairment;

(b) All debts, liabilities, and other obligations of the converting organization continue as obligations of the converted organization;

(c) An action or proceeding pending by or against the converting organization may be continued as if the conversion had not occurred;

(d) Except as prohibited by other law, all of the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the converting organization remain vested in the converted organization;

(e) Except as otherwise provided in the plan of conversion, the terms and conditions of the plan of conversion take effect; and

(f) Except as otherwise agreed, the conversion does not dissolve a converting limited partnership for the purposes of article 8 of this chapter.

(3) A converted organization that is a foreign organization consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to enforce any obligation owed by the converting limited partnership, if before the conversion the converting limited partnership was subject to suit in this state on the obligation. A converted organization that is a foreign organization and not registered to transact business in this state may be served with process pursuant to RCW 23.95.450 for purposes of enforcing an obligation under this subsection.

[ 2022 c 42 s 206; 2015 c 176 s 6127; 2009 c 188 s 1105.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.